Utah statutes.
48-2a-606.   Right to distribution.

At the time a partner becomes entitled to receive a distribution, he has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited partnership with respect to the distribution.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 1990 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

